fr: Format du gobo: Taille A (100 mm); Taille B (86 mm; Personnalisé / propriétaire; Taille D (66 mm); Taille E (86 mm); Taille M (37,5 mm); fin); Autre
th: รูปแบบโกโบ: ขนาด A (100 มม.); ขนาด B (86 มม.; กำหนดเอง / กรรมสิทธิ์; ขนาด D (66 มม.); ขนาด E (86 มม.); ขนาด M (37.5 มม.); แบบบาง); อื่นๆ
en: Gobo format: A-size (100 mm); B-size (86 mm; Custom / proprietary; D-size (66 mm); E-size (86 mm); M-size (37.5 mm); thin); Other
ru: Формат гобо: Размер A (100 мм); Размер B (86 мм; Пользовательский / проприетарный; Размер D (66 мм); Размер E (86 мм); Размер M (37,5 мм); тонкий); Другое
de: Gobo-Format: A-Size (100 mm); B-Size (86 mm; Benutzerdefiniert / proprietär; D-Size (66 mm); E-Size (86 mm); M-Size (37,5 mm); dünn); Andere
el: Μορφή Gobo: Μέγεθος A (100 mm); Μέγεθος B (86 mm; Προσαρμοσμένο / Ιδιόκτητο; Μέγεθος D (66 mm); Μέγεθος E (86 mm); Μέγεθος M (37,5 mm); λεπτό); Άλλο
pl: Format gobo: Rozmiar A (100 mm); Rozmiar B (86 mm; Niestandardowy / własny; Rozmiar D (66 mm); Rozmiar E (86 mm); Rozmiar M (37,5 mm); cienki); Inny
es: Formato de gobo: Tamaño A (100 mm); Tamaño B (86 mm; Personalizado / patentado; Tamaño D (66 mm); Tamaño E (86 mm); Tamaño M (37,5 mm); fino); Otro
ko: 고보 규격: A 사이즈(100 mm); B 사이즈(86 mm; 사용자 지정 / 독점; D 사이즈(66 mm); E 사이즈(86 mm); M 사이즈(37.5 mm); 얇음); 기타
hu: Gobo formátuma: A-méret (100 mm); B-méret (86 mm; Egyedi / saját; D-méret (66 mm); E-méret (86 mm); M-méret (37,5 mm); vékony); Egyéb
bg-BG: Формат на гобо шаблона: Размер A (100 mm); Размер B (86 mm; По поръчка/собствен стандарт; Размер D (66 mm); Размер E (86 mm); Размер M (37,5 mm); тънък); Друго
sl-SI: Format gobo šablone: Velikost A (100 mm); Velikost B (86 mm; Po meri / lastniško; Velikost D (66 mm); Velikost E (86 mm); Velikost M (37,5 mm); tanka); Drugo
nl: Gobo formaat: A-formaat (100 mm); B-formaat (86 mm; Aangepast / eigen; D-formaat (66 mm); E-formaat (86 mm); M-formaat (37,5 mm); dun); Anders
zh-CN: 图案片规格: A 号（100 毫米）; B 号（86 毫米; 定制/专有; D 号（66 毫米）; E 号（86 毫米）; M 号（37.5 毫米）; 薄）; 其他
vi: Định dạng Gobo: Cỡ A (100 mm); Cỡ B (86 mm; Tùy chỉnh / Độc quyền; Cỡ D (66 mm); Cỡ E (86 mm); Cỡ M (37,5 mm); mỏng); Khác
ja: ゴボフォーマット: Aサイズ (100 mm); Bサイズ (86 mm; カスタム / 独自の; Dサイズ (66 mm); Eサイズ (86 mm); Mサイズ (37.5 mm); 薄型); その他
fi: Gobon muoto: A-koko (100 mm); B-koko (86 mm; Mukautettu / omistusoikeudellinen; D-koko (66 mm); E-koko (86 mm); M-koko (37,5 mm); ohut); Muu
nb: Gobo-format: A-størrelse (100 mm); B-størrelse (86 mm; Spesialtilpasset / proprietær; D-størrelse (66 mm); E-størrelse (86 mm); M-størrelse (37,5 mm); tynn); Annet
ro-RO: Formatul Gobo: Mărimea A (100 mm); Mărimea B (86 mm; Personalizat/proprietar; Mărimea D (66 mm); Mărimea E (86 mm); Mărimea M (37,5 mm); subțire); Altele
sk-SK: Forma gobo vložky: Veľkosť A (100 mm); Veľkosť B (86 mm; Vlastná / proprietárna; Veľkosť D (66 mm); Veľkosť E (86 mm); Veľkosť M (37,5 mm); tenké); Iné
pt-PT: Formato Gobo: Tamanho A (100 mm); Tamanho B (86 mm; Personalizado/proprietário; Tamanho D (66 mm); Tamanho E (86 mm); Tamanho M (37,5 mm); fino); Outro
lt-LT: Gobo formatas: A dydis (100 mm); B dydis (86 mm; Pritaikytas / nuosavybinis formatas; D dydis (66 mm); E dydis (86 mm); M dydis (37,5 mm); plonas); Kita
da: Gobo-format: A-størrelse (100 mm); B-størrelse (86 mm; Tilpasset / navnebeskyttet; D-størrelse (66 mm); E-størrelse (86 mm); M-størrelse (37,5 mm); tynd); Andet
hr-HR: Gobo format: Veličina A (100 mm); Veličina B (86 mm; Prilagođeno/vlasničko; Veličina D (66 mm); Veličina E (86 mm); Veličina M (37,5 mm); tanko); Ostalo
pt-BR: Formato do gobo: Tamanho A (100 mm); Tamanho B (86 mm; Personalizado / proprietário; Tamanho D (66 mm); Tamanho E (86 mm); Tamanho M (37,5 mm); fino); Outro
it: Formato del gobo: Misura A (100 mm); Misura B (86 mm; Personalizzato / proprietario; Misura D (66 mm); Misura E (86 mm); Misura M (37,5 mm); sottile); Altro
sv: Gobo-format: A-storlek (100 mm); B-storlek (86 mm; Anpassad/märkesspecifik; D-storlek (66 mm); E-storlek (86 mm); M-storlek (37,5 mm); tunn); Annat
cs: Formát goba: Velikost A (100 mm); Velikost B (86 mm; Vlastní / chráněné; Velikost D (66 mm); Velikost E (86 mm); Velikost M (37,5 mm); tenké); Ostatní
tr: Gobo şekli: A boyutu (100 mm); B boyutu (86 mm; Özel; D boyutu (66 mm); E boyutu (86 mm); M boyutu (37,5 mm); ince); Diğer
zh-TW: 圖案片規格: A 尺寸 (100 公釐); B 尺寸 (86 公釐; 自訂 / 專有; D 尺寸 (66 公釐); E 尺寸 (86 公釐); M 尺寸 (37.5 公釐); 薄); 其他